Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1702
Definitions; where found.

For purposes of the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 59-1703 to 59-1714.01 shall be used.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 3.